Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4792.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; BOUNDARY WATERS CARE CENTER.new text end new text begin $250,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of human services for a rate add-on under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 256R, for Boundary Waters Care Center in Ely. This is a onetime appropriation and must be paid without federal matching money. new text end